apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON __num
%<num%>:ು #;
%<num%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನ ondu ;
%<num%>%<emph%>:ೆ #;
%<num%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<num%>:ೆಂದು #;!?
%<num%>: ondu;!
%<num%>%+ಅಲ್ಲ%<neg%>:ಲ್ಲ #;
%<num%>:ರ #;!ರಷ್ಟು	
%<num%>:ರ ashtu ;	
%<num%>%<emph%>:ೂ #;!ದ
%<num%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit;!ದ
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೇಯ #;
%<num%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ #;
%<num%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit ;
%<num%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನು #;
%<num%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ನ್ನೂ #;
%<num%>%<emph%>:ೇ #;
%<num%>%<pl%>:ಾರು #;
%<num%>%<pl%>:ಂತರ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೆ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೇ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೆಯ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೆಯದ aagi__com;
%<num%>%<ord%>%+adu%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ನೆಯದು #;!
%<num%>%<ord%>:ಲ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<nom%>:ಲು #;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<nom%>%+ಬಾರಿ%<n%>%<nt%>:ಲಬಾರಿಗೆ #;

%<num%>: aagi__com ;
%<num%>+ಎಡೆ%<adv%>:ೆಡೆ #;
%<num%>:ante ;


LEXICON __pos__num
%<num%>%<ord%>: #;
%<adv%>:ವಾಗಿ #;

LEXICON __th
%<ord%>: #;


LEXICON __numeral
%<num%>: #;
%<num%>%<pl%>:ಾರು #;!ಸಾವಿರಾರು 
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೆಯ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೇಯ #;
%<num%>%<ord%>:ನೇ #;
%<num%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<num%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<num%>%<loc%>:ರ #;
%<num%>%<loc%>:ರಂದು #;
%<num%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ #;
%<num%>%<perc%>:ರಷ್ಟು #;
%<num%>%<adv%>:ಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<num%>%<adv%>:ಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit;
%<num%>:ದ ashtu ;
%<num%>%<gen%>:ದ #;



LEXICON parti!endu !quotative
%+ಎಂದು%<part%>:ವೆಂದು #;
%+ಎಂದು%<part%>:ವೆಂದ oo__inc_clit;
%+ಎಂದು%<part%>:ಯೆಂದು #;
%+ಎಂದು%<part%>:ಂದ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON ಇಲ್ಲ__neg
%<adv%>: #;
%<adv%>:ante;
%<adv%>:ವೋ #;
%<interr%>:ವೇ #;
%<interr%>:ವೆ #;
%<adv%>: parti ;
%<neg%>%<emph%>:ದೇ #;



LEXICON __neg
%<neg%>: #;

LEXICON __eng
%<eng%>: #;
%<eng%>%<gen%>:ರ #;
%<eng%>%<ord%>:ನೇ #;
%<eng%>%<gen%>:ನ #;
%<eng%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು #;
%<eng%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<eng%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿನ #;
%<eng%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ #;



 !LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot
a 												__eng;
the 											__eng;
The 											__eng;
their 											__eng;
of 												__eng;
for 											__eng;
and 											__eng;
in 												__eng;
to 												__eng;
À 												__eng;
is 												__eng;
I 												__eng;
II 												__eng;!num
on 												__eng;
br 												__eng;!break
as 												__eng;
that 											__eng;
was 											__eng;
with 											__eng;
by 												__eng;
poem 											__eng;
C 												__eng;
from 											__eng;
DNA 											__eng;!abbr
WWE 											__eng;	
U.S												__eng;
U.% S											__eng;
UK 												__eng;
TV 												__eng;
or 												__eng;
DVD:DVD 										__eng;
EU:EU 											__eng;
Nokia:Nokia 									__eng;
H-1B:H-1B 										__eng;
ODI:ODI 										__eng;
BMW:BMW 										__eng;
CEO:CEO 										__eng;
É:É 											__eng;
B:B 											__eng;
RFC:RFC         								__eng;
PBX:PBX         								__eng;
LP:LP           								__eng;
MP:MP 											__eng;
SEZ:SEZ         								__eng;                                        
NTFS:NTFS       								__eng;                                          
Inc:Inc         								__eng;                                        
GA:GA           								__eng;                                      
ACT:ACT         								__eng;                                        
PC:PC 											__eng;   
OS:OS 											__eng;   			
UI:UI           								__eng;                                    
ISP:ISP         								__eng;
IQ:IQ           								__eng;
IDE:IDE         								__eng;
formula_13:formula_13                           __eng;
V6:V6           								__eng;
mRNA:mRNA       								__eng;    
Siemens:Siemens 								__eng;
RIAA:RIAA       								__eng;  
RFID:RFID       								__eng;     
BAFTA:BAFTA     								__eng;  
NWA:NWA         								__eng;
CFC:CFC         								__eng;
FIFA:FIFA       								__eng;
IBM:IBM 										__eng;        
IP:IP           								__eng; 
ABC:ABC         								__eng; 
NBA:NBA         								__eng; 
WCW:WCW         								__eng; 
SMS:SMS         								__eng; 
CO2:CO2         								__eng; 
USA:USA         								__eng; 
ಒಂದು:ಒಂದ 						__num;
ಒಂದು:ಒ೦ದ 						__num;
ಮೊದಲ:ಮೊದಲ 					__num;
ಮೊದಲ:ಮೊದ 						__num;!
ಎರಡು:ಎರಡ 						__num;
ಮೂರು:ಮೂರ 						__num;
ಮೂರು:ಮ‌ೂರ 						__num;
ನಾಲ್ಕು:ನಾಲ್ಕ 						__num;
ಐದು:ಐದ 							__num;
ಆರು:ಆರ   						__num;
ಏಳು:ಏಳ 							__num;
ಎಂಟು:ಎಂಟ 						__num;
ಒಂಬತ್ತು:ಒಂಬತ್ತ 					__num;
ಒಂಭತ್ತು:ಒಂಭತ್ತ 					__num;
ಹತ್ತು:ಹತ್ತ 						__num;!10
ಹನ್ನೊಂದು:ಹನ್ನೊಂದ 				__num;
ಹನ್ನೆರಡು:ಹನ್ನೆರಡ 					__num;
ಹದಿನೈದು:ಹದಿನೈದ 					__num;
ಹದಿಮೂರು:ಹದಿಮೂರ 				__num;
ಹದಿನಾಲ್ಕು:ಹದಿನಾಲ್ಕ 				__num;!16
ಹದಿನೇಳು:ಹದಿನೇಳ 					__num;
ಹದಿನಾರು:ಹದಿನಾರ 					__num;
ಹದಿನೆಂಟು:ಹದಿನೆಂಟ 					__num;
ಹತ್ತೊಂಬತ್ತ:ಹತ್ತೊಂಬತ್ತ 			__num;
ಇಪ್ಪತ್ತು:ಇಪ್ಪತ್ತ 				__num;!20
ಇಪ್ಪತ್ತೈದು:ಇಪ್ಪತ್ತೈದ 				__num;!25
ಮೂವತ್ತು:ಮೂವತ್ತ 					__num;
ನಲವತ್ತು:ನಲವತ್ತ  					__num;!40			
ಐವತ್ತು:ಐವತ್ತ 					__num;
ಅರವತ್ತು:ಅರವತ್ತ 					__num;
ನೂರು:ನೂರ 						__num;!100
ಇಲ್ಲ:ಇಲ್ಲ 									ಇಲ್ಲ__neg;
ಇಲ್ಲದ:ಇಲ್ಲದ 								__neg;
ಅಲ್ಲ:ಅಲ್ಲ 									__neg;
ಪ್ರಥಮ:ಪ್ರಥಮ 								__pos__num;
ದ್ವಿತೀಯ:ದ್ವಿತೀಯ 							__pos__num;
ತೃತೀಯ:ತೃತೀಯ 								__pos__num;
ಪಂಚಮಿ:ಪಂಚಮಿ  								__pos__num;
ನೆ 											__th;
ನೇ:ನೇ 										__th;
ನೆಯ:ನೆಯ 										__th;			
ಮಿಲಿಯನ್:ಮಿಲಿಯನ್ 							__numeral;!Million
ಬಿಲಿಯನ್:ಬಿಲಿಯನ್ 							__numeral;!Billion
ದಶಲಕ್ಷ:ದಶಲಕ್ಷ 								__numeral;!10 laks
ಚಾರ್:ಚಾರ್  									__numeral;
ಏಕ್:ಏಕ್ 										__numeral;
ವನ್:ವನ್  									__numeral;!1
ಫೋರ್:ಫೋರ್ 									__numeral;!4
ಫೈವ್  										__numeral;	!
ಸಿಕ್ಸ್:ಸಿಕ್ಸ್  								__numeral;!6
ಸೆವೆನ್:ಸೆವೆನ್ 									__numeral;!7
ನೈನ್:ನೈನ್ 										__numeral;!9
ಟೆನ್:ಟೆನ್  									__numeral;!10
ಟ್ವೆಂಟಿ:ಟ್ವೆಂಟಿ 								__numeral;!20 						
ಮೊದಲಿಗೆ:ಮೊದಲಿಗೆ 								__numeral;
ಮೊದಲಿನ:ಮೊದಲಿನ 								__numeral;
ಒನ್:ಒನ್ 							 			__numeral;
ಏಕ:ಏಕ 										 __numeral;
ಪಂಚ:ಪಂಚ                             		 __numeral;
ನವ:ನವ 										 __numeral;
ಸಾವಿರಾ:ಸಾವಿರ 									 __numeral;
ಲಕ್ಷಾ:ಲಕ್ಷಾ  								 	 __numeral;
ಲಕ್ಷ:ಲಕ್ಷ 									 __numeral;
ಲಕ್ಷಾಂತರ:ಲಕ್ಷಾಂತರ 							 __numeral;	
ದಶಲಕ್ಷ:ದಶಲಕ್ಷ 								 __numeral;
ಶತಕೋಟಿ:ಶತಕೋಟಿ 								 __numeral;	
ಕೋಟಿ:ಕೋಟಿ 									 __numeral;	
ಸಹಸ್ರಾರು:ಸಹಸ್ರಾರು 								 __numeral;
